District of Columbia statutes.
32-1304

Unconditional payment of wages conceded to be due.

In case of a bona fide dispute concerning the amount of wages due, the employer shall give written notice to the employee of the amount of wages which he concedes to be due, and shall pay such amount, without condition, within the time required by §§ 32-1302 and 32-1303; provided, however, that acceptance by the employee of any payment made hereunder shall not constitute a release as to the balance of his claim. The employee or Mayor shall be able to pursue any such balance of unpaid wages and related damages, interest, costs, and penalties.

History

Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 48, 45 DCR 745
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-157, § 2(c), 61 DCR 10157

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-1307.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-104.
1973 Ed., § 36-604.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-157 rewrote the last sentence.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-240, March 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1332).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 2(c) of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-544, Dec. 29, 2014, 62 DCR 243, 20 STAT 4458).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-188, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14224).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-157: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-157 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014, and that the act shall apply to violations occurring after October 1, 2014.